en: Secale
xx: Secale
de: Secale, Roggenarten
es: Secale
fr: Secale
hr: Secale
la: Secale
nl: Secale
zh: 黑麦属

en: Rye
de: Roggen
es: Centeno
fr: Seigle
hr: Raž
it: Segale
ja: ライ麦, ライムギ
la: Secale cereale
lt: Rugiai
nl: Rogge, Rogges
tr: Çavdar
zh: 裸麦

en: Whole rye
fr: Seigle entier

en: Sesame, raw sesame, sesame seeds
bg: Сусам, сусамово семе
de: Sesam
es: Sésamo, Ajonjolí, Semillas de sésamo
fi: seesami
fr: Sésame, Graines de sésame
he: שומשום
hr: sezam
it: Sesamo
ja: ゴマ, ごま, 胡麻
la: Sesamum indicum
lt: Sezamai, Sezamas
nl: Sesamzaden, Sesamzaad
zh: 芝麻

en: Black Sesame, black sesame seeds
fr: Sésame noir, Graines de sésame noir

en: Husked sesame seed, Sesame seed husked
fr: graine de sésame décortiquée
hr: Oljušteni sezam
lt: Lukštenti sezamai

en: Toasted sesame, grilled sesame, husked sesame, Sesame seeds (roasted)
de: Gerösteter Sesam
es: Semillas de sésamo tostadas
fr: Sésame toasté, Graines de sésame toastées
hr: Prženi sezam
lt: Skrudinti sezamai, Kepinti sezamai
nl: Geroosterde sesamzaden, Geroosterde sesamzaad
zh: 烤芝麻

en: Sorghum, Whole sorghum
de: Sorghumhirsen
es: Sorgo
fr: Sorgho, Sorgho entier
hr: Sirak
it: Sorgo
la: Sorghum bicolor
nl: Sorghum, Sorgho, Kafferkoren
zh: 高粱

en: Teff, Eragrostis tef
xx: Teff
de: Teff
es: Teff, Tef
fr: Teff
hr: Teff
it: Teff
ja: テフ
la: Eragrostis tef
nl: Teff
zh: 苔麸

en: Triticale
xx: Triticale
de: Triticale
es: Triticale
fr: Triticale
la: x Triticosecale
nl: Triticale

en: Wheats
bg: Пшеница
de: Triticum
es: Trigos, Trigo
fi: vehnät
fr: Blés, Blé
hr: Pšenice
it: Grano
ja: コムギ属
la: Triticum
lt: Kviečiai
nl: Tarwes, Tarwe
tr: Buğday

en: Common wheats, Bread wheats, whole wheats
de: Weichweizen, Brotweizen
es: Trigos blandos, Trigos comunes, Trigos harineros
fr: Blés tendres, Froments, Blés ordinaires, Blés tendre, Blés tendres entiers
hr: Obične pšenice
it: Grano tenero
ja: パンコムギ
la: Triticum aestivum, Triticum aestivum subsp. aestivum
lt: Pilnagrūdžiai kviečiai, Nesmulkinti kviečiai, duonos kviečiai
nl: Gewone tarwes, Gewone tarwe

en: Norin 10 wheats
de: Norin 10 Weizen
es: Trigos Norin 10
fr: Blés Norin 10
hr: Norin 10 pšenice

en: Durum wheats, Macaroni wheats
bg: Твърда пшеница
de: Hartweizen, Durumweizen
es: Trigos duros, Trigo duro
fr: Blés durs
hr: Durum pšenice
it: Grano duro
ja: デュラムコムギ, デュラム小麦, マカロニコムギ
la: Triticum durum, Triticum turgidum subsp. durum
lt: Kietieji kviečiai, Makaroniniai kviečiai
nl: Durum tarwes, harde tarwes, Durum tarwe, Harde tarwe

en: Einkorn wheats
bg: Лимец
de: Einkorn
es: Trigos escaña cultivada, Escañas
fr: Petits épeautres, Engrains, Engrain
hr: Jednozrnate pšenice
it: Farro piccolo
la: Triticum monococcum
nl: Eenkoorn, Eenkoren

en: Emmer wheats
de: Emmer, Sommerdinkel
es: Escandas, Povia
fr: Amidonniers
hr: Emmer pšenice
it: Farro, farro medio, farro dicocco
la: Triticum dicoccum, Triticum turgidum subsp. dicoccum, Triticum turgidum subsp. dicoccon
nl: Emmertarwe, tweekoren

en: Khorasan wheats, Kamut
de: Khorasan Weizen, Kamut
es: Trigos de Jorasán, Kamut
fr: Blés khorasan, blés de khorasan, Kamut
hr: Khorasan pšenice
it: Grano khorasan
la: Triticum turanicum, Triticum turgidum subsp. turanicum
nl: Khorasantarwe, Kamut

en: Spelts, Spelt flour
ar: حنطة
bg: спелта
br: yell
ca: espelta
cs: špalda, pšenice špalda
da: spelt
de: Dinkel
el: όλυρα, ντίνκελ, σπέλτα
eo: spelto
es: Espeltas, Escaña mayor, Escanda mayor
et: speltanisu, spelta
eu: espelta
fa: اسپلت
fi: Speltit, Spelttijauho, spelttivehnä, speltti, spelttiä
fr: Épeautres, Épeautre, Grands épeautres, Grand épeautre
ga: speilt
gl: espelta
he: כוסמין
hr: pravi pir
hu: tönkölybúza, tönköly
io: spelto
is: spelt
it: spelta, farro spelta, farro grande
ja: スペルトコムギ
ko: 스펠트밀
la: Triticum spelta, Triticum aestivum subsp. spelta
lb: Spelz
lt: Speltos, speltų miltai
lv: speltas kvieši
mk: крупник
ms: spelt
mt: farru, qamħ spelt
nb: spelt
nl: Spelt
nn: spelt
oc: espeuta
pl: orkisz, pszenica orkisz
pt: espelta
ro: alac, grâu spelt, alac spelt
ru: спельта
sk: špalda
sl: pira
sr: крупник, krupnik
sv: spelt, speltvete
ta: ஸ்பெல்ட்
tr: kavuzlu buğday
tt: борай
uk: спельта
wa: speate
zh: 斯佩耳特小麦

en: Wild rice, wild rice
bg: Див ориз
de: Wildreis, Wilder Reis
es: Arroz salvaje, Arroz silvestre, Zizania
fi: Intiaaniriisi, Villiriisi
fr: Riz sauvage, zizanie des marais, zizanie, Riz sauvage cru
hr: Divlja riža
it: Riso selvatico
la: Zizania
lt: Laukiniai ryžiai
nl: Wilde rijsten, Wilde rijst
pt: Arrozes selvagens

en: Precooked rices, Instant rices, Rapid cooking rices, Pre-cooked rice
da: forkogt ris, forkogte ris
de: Vorgegarter Reis
es: Arroces precocidos, Arroces rápidos, Arroces de cocción rápida
fr: Riz précuits natures, riz précuits, riz précuit, riz pré-cuit, riz pré-cuits, riz précuits nature, riz précuit nature
hr: Prethodno kuhane riže
it: Risi precotti
lt: Greitai paruošiami ryžiai
nl: Voorgekookte rijsten, Voorgekookte rijst